ja: 対応スピンタイプ: バックスピン; ナックルボール; 左スピン; なし; 右スピン; トップスピン; その他
tr: Desteklenen dönüş türleri: Ters falso; Falsosuz (knuckleball); Sola falso; Hiçbiri; Sağa falso; Üst falso; Diğer
fr: Types d’effets pris en charge: Effet rétro; Balle papillon; Effet à gauche; Aucun; Effet à droite; Topspin; Autre
sk-SK: Podporované typy rotácie: Spätná rotácia; Knuckleball; Rotácia doľava; Žiadna; Rotácia doprava; Horná rotácia; Iné
es: Tipos de giro admitidos: Backspin; Bola de nudillos; Efecto a la izquierda; Ninguno; Efecto a la derecha; Topspin; Otro
da: Understøttede spintyper: Backspin; Knuckleball; Venstreskru; Ingen; Højreskru; Topspin; Andet
ru: Поддерживаемые типы вращения: Обратное вращение; Наклбол; Левое вращение; Нет; Правое вращение; Верхнее вращение; Другое
ko: 지원 스핀 유형: 백스핀; 너클볼; 좌스핀; 없음; 우스핀; 톱스핀; 기타
lt-LT: Palaikomi sukimo tipai: Atgalinis sukimas; Be sukimosi (Knuckleball); Sukimas kairėn; Nėra; Sukimas dešinėn; Viršutinis sukimas; Kitas
en: Supported spin types: Backspin; Knuckleball; Left spin; None; Right spin; Topspin; Other
pt-BR: Tipos de spin compatíveis: Backspin; Knuckleball; Efeito para a esquerda; Nenhum; Efeito para a direita; Topspin; Outros
sl-SI: Podprte vrste vrtenja: Spodnja rotacija; Knuckleball; Leva rotacija; Brez; Desna rotacija; Zgornja rotacija; Drugo
zh-CN: 支持的旋转类型: 下旋; 蝴蝶球; 左旋; 无; 右旋; 上旋; 其他
bg-BG: Поддържани видове спин: Бекспин; Нъкълбол; Ляв фалц; Няма; Десен фалц; Топспин; Друго
nb: Støttede spinntyper: Backspin; Knuckleball; Venstreskru; Ingen; Høyreskru; Topspin; Annet
hu: Támogatott pörgetési típusok: Hátrapörgés; Knuckleball; Balra pörgés; Nincs; Jobbra pörgés; Felsőpörgés; Egyéb
vi: Các loại spin được hỗ trợ: Xoáy ngược; Knuckleball; Xoáy trái; Không; Xoáy phải; Xoáy lên; Khác
nl: Ondersteunde spintypes: Backspin; Knuckleball; Linkse spin; Geen; Rechtse spin; Topspin; Overig
pl: Obsługiwane rodzaje rotacji: Rotacja wsteczna (backspin); Piłka znikomą rotacją (knuckleball); Rotacja w lewo; Brak; Rotacja w prawo; Rotacja awansująca (topspin); Inne
cs: Podporované typy rotace: Spodní rotace; Knuckleball; Levá rotace; Žádná; Pravá rotace; Horní rotace; Jiné
fi: Tuetut kierretyypit: Alakierre; Knuckleball; Vasen kierre; Ei mitään; Oikea kierre; Yläkierre; Muu
ro-RO: Tipuri de rotire acceptate: Backspin; Minge fără efect; Efect de stânga; Fără; Efect de dreapta; Topspin; Altele
th: ประเภทการหมุนที่รองรับ: แบ็กสปิน; นัคเคิลบอล; สปินซ้าย; ไม่มี; สปินขวา; ท็อปสปิน; อื่นๆ
it: Tipi di rotazione supportati: Backspin; Knuckleball; Effetto a sinistra; Nessuno; Effetto a destra; Topspin; Altro
de: Unterstützte Spin-Arten: Backspin; Knuckleball; Linksdrall; Keiner; Rechtsdrall; Topspin; Sonstige
hr-HR: Podržane vrste vrtnje: Backspin; Knuckleball; Lijevi spin; Bez spina; Desni spin; Topspin; Ostalo
zh-TW: 支援旋轉類型: 下旋; 蝴蝶球/無旋轉球; 左旋; 無; 右旋; 上旋; 其他
sv: Stödda spinntyper: Underskruv; Skruvfri; Vänsterskruv; Ingen; Högerskruv; Överskruv; Övrigt
el: Υποστηριζόμενοι τύποι περιστροφής: Backspin; Knuckleball; Αριστερό φάλτσο; Κανένα; Δεξί φάλτσο; Topspin; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipos de rotação suportados: Rotação invertida; Bola com trajetória irregular; Rotação à esquerda; Nenhum; Rotação à direita; Rotação superior; Outro